Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 2 Duties of Utilities and Carriers

39-2-1.
Reasonable and adequate services — Reasonable and just charges.

Every public utility is required to furnish safe, reasonable, and adequate services and facilities. The rate, toll, or charge, or any joint rate made, exacted, demanded, or collected by any public utility for the conveyance or transportation of any persons or property, including sewage, between points within the state; or for any heat, light, water, or power produced, transmitted, distributed, delivered, or furnished; or for any telephone or telegraph message conveyed; or for any service rendered or to be rendered in connection therewith, shall be reasonable and just, and every unjust or unreasonable charge for the service is prohibited and declared unlawful, and no public utility providing heat, light, water, or power produced, transmitted, distributed, delivered, or furnished shall terminate the service or deprive any home or building, or whatsoever, of service if the reason therefor is nonpayment of the service without first notifying the user of the service, or the owner, or owners, of the building as recorded with the utility of the impending service termination by written notice at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of the proposed termination of service.

Effective immediately, following the issuance of a decision by the commission under §

39-1-27.12(d)

, the utility shall collect a LIHEAP enhancement charge from all utility customers for the funding of the LIHEAP Enhancement Fund.

Any existing rules and regulations dealing with the termination of utility service and establishing reasonable methods of debt collection promulgated by the commission pursuant to this chapter and the provisions of §

39-1.1-3

including, but not limited to, any rules and regulations dealing with deposit and deferred-payment arrangements, winter moratorium and medical emergency protections, and customer dispute resolution procedures, shall be applicable to any public utility that distributes electricity.

The commission shall promulgate such further rules and regulations as are necessary to protect consumers following the introduction of competition in the electric industry and that are consistent with this chapter and the provisions of §

39-1.1-3

. In promulgating the rules and regulations, the commission shall confer with the retail electric licensing commission and shall give reasonable consideration to any and all recommendations of the retail electric licensing commission.

On or before August 15, 2011, the commission shall administer the rules and regulations, as may be necessary, to implement the purpose of subsection (d)(2) of this section and to provide for the restoration of electric and/or gas service to Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP)-eligible households, as this eligibility is defined in the current LIHEAP state plan for Rhode Island filed with the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.

Effective no later than September 1, 2016, notwithstanding the provisions of part V sections 4(E)(1)(B) and (C) of the public utilities commission rules and regulations governing the termination of residential electric, gas, and water utility service, a LIHEAP-eligible customer, as defined above in this section, who has been terminated from gas and/or electric service or is recognized, pursuant to a rule or decision by the division, as being scheduled for actual shutoff of service on a specific date, shall not be deprived electric and/or gas utility service provided the following conditions are met:

The customer has an account balance of at least three hundred dollars ($300) that is more than sixty (60) days past due;

The customer is eligible for the federal Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program and the account is enrolled in the utility low-income rate if offered;

If utility service has been terminated, the customer shall make an initial payment of twenty-five percent (25%) of the unpaid balance, unless the commission has enacted emergency regulations in which case the customer shall pay the down payment required by the emergency regulations;

The customer agrees to participate in energy efficiency programs;

The customer applies for other available energy-assistance programs, including fuel assistance and weatherization;

The customer agrees to make at least twelve (12) monthly payments in an amount determined by the utility and based on the customer’s average monthly usage of the previous year, and the customer’s actual or anticipated fuel assistance, if known. The electric- and/or gas-utility company shall review the payment plan every three (3) months and may adjust the plan based on the following: the amount of or change in fuel assistance; the customer moves; actual usage differs from estimated usage; and/or significant changes in the company’s energy costs or rates from the time of anticipated enrollment;

With each payment, a portion of the customer’s outstanding account balance shall be forgiven in an amount equal to the total past-due balance divided by the number of months in the customer agreement;

Up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) shall be forgiven in a twelve-month (12) period. If the outstanding account balance is greater than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), the length of the agreement may, at the request of the customer, be extended for more than twelve (12) months to accommodate the total outstanding balance, provided that the customer is current with payments at the conclusion of the previous twelve-month (12) period;

The customer agrees to remain current with payments. For purposes of this subsection, remaining current shall mean that the customer: (A) Misses no more than two (2) payments in a twelve-month (12) period covered by the agreement; and (B) That the amount due under the agreement is paid in full, by the conclusion of the twelve-month (12) period of the agreement;

Failure to comply with the payment provisions set forth in this subsection shall be grounds for the customer to be removed from the repayment program established by this subsection and the balance due on the unpaid balance shall be due and payable in full, in accordance with the rules of the commission governing the termination of residential electric, gas, and water utility service, provided, that any arrearage already forgiven under subsection (d)(2)(vii) of this section shall remain forgiven and be written off by the utility. The amount of the arrearage, so forgiven, shall be recovered by the electric and/or gas company through an annual reconciling factor approved by the commission;

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this section that ensure efficient administration of the program in a nondiscriminatory manner consistent with the goal of providing assistance to customers who are willing and able to meet their obligations to the utility under this program;

Each public utility that provides gas or electric service to residential ratepayers shall file tariffs implementing the requirements of this section on a date to be determined by the commission which shall allow for the program to be in place no later than October 1, 2016;

After two (2) years from the date of completion of the plan or removal from the plan for failure to remain current with payments and upon recommendation from a community action partnership agency, a customer shall be eligible to enroll in a subsequent arrearage forgiveness plan; and

A customer, who completes the schedule of payments pursuant to this subsection, shall have the balance of any arrearage forgiven, and the customer’s obligation to the gas and/or electric company for such unpaid balance shall be deemed to be fully satisfied. The amount of the arrearage, so forgiven, shall be treated as bad debt for purposes of cost recovery by the gas or the electric company up to the amount allowed in the gas and/or electric company’s most recent general rate filing. In the event the gas or electric company’s bad debt for a calendar year exceeds the amount allowed in the most recent general-rate filing for the same period, the gas or electric company shall be entitled to recovery of those write-offs that were the result of the arrearage forgiveness plan set forth in this section.

A customer terminated from service under the provisions of subsection (d)(1) or (d)(2) shall be eligible for restoration of service in accordance with the applicable provisions of part V section 4(E)(1)(C), or its successor provision, of the public utilities commission rules and regulations governing the termination of residential electric, gas, and water service.

The commission shall complete a comprehensive review of all utility and energy-related programs and policies impacting protected classes and low-income ratepayers. In conducting its review, the commission shall consult with the division, the attorney general, the utility, the department of human services, the ratepayers advisory board established by §

39-1-37.1

, community-based organizations, a homeless advisory group, and community action agencies, each of whom shall cooperate with meetings scheduled by the commission and any requests for information received by the commission by providing responses within twenty-one (21) days from issuance. The commission shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor and the general assembly no later than November 1, 2018. No later than November 15, 2017, and annually thereafter, the commission shall submit to the governor, the senate president, and the speaker of the house a report on the effectiveness of the customer arrearage program which shall include a cost-benefit analysis and recommendations to improve the effectiveness of the arrearage program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-1

; P.L. 1968, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 3; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 357, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 11; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 7; P.L. 2007, ch. 51, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 66, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 382, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 404, § 6; P.L. 2016, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 125, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 137, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 16; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 3.

39-2-1.1.
Services to new occupants.

No public utility shall refuse to furnish services to new occupants at any premises on the grounds that the previous occupant has vacated the premises without paying the public utility for services furnished, provided that the service is not for the use or benefit of the previous occupant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 219, § 1.

39-2-1.2.
Utility base rate — Advertising, demand-side management, and renewables.

In addition to costs prohibited in §

39-1-27.4(b)

, no public utility distributing or providing heat, electricity, or water to or for the public shall include as part of its base rate any expenses for advertising, either direct or indirect, that promotes the use of its product or service, or is designed to promote the public image of the industry. No public utility may furnish support of any kind, direct or indirect, to any subsidiary, group, association, or individual for advertising and include the expense as part of its base rate. Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed as prohibiting the inclusion in the base rate of expenses incurred for advertising, informational or educational in nature, that is designed to promote public safety conservation of the public utility’s product or service. The public utilities commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to require public disclosure of all advertising expenses of any kind, direct or indirect, and to otherwise effectuate the provisions of this section.

Effective as of January 1, 2008, and for a period of twenty (20) years thereafter, each electric distribution company shall include a charge per kilowatt-hour delivered to fund demand-side management programs. The 0.3 mills per kilowatt-hour delivered to fund renewable energy programs shall remain in effect until December 31, 2028. The electric distribution company shall establish and, after July 1, 2007, maintain, two (2) separate accounts, one for demand-side management programs (the “demand-side account”), which shall be funded by the electric demand-side charge and administered and implemented by the distribution company, subject to the regulatory reviewing authority of the commission, and one for renewable energy programs, which shall be administered by the Rhode Island commerce corporation pursuant to §

42-64-13.2

and shall be held and disbursed by the distribution company as directed by the Rhode Island commerce corporation for the purposes of developing, promoting, and supporting renewable energy programs.

During the time periods established in this subsection, the commission may, in its discretion, after notice and public hearing, increase the sums for demand-side management and renewable resources. In addition, the commission shall, after notice and public hearing, determine the appropriate charge for these programs. The office of energy resources, and/or the administrator of the renewable energy programs, may seek to secure for the state an equitable and reasonable portion of renewable energy credits or certificates created by private projects funded through those programs. As used in this section, “renewable energy resources” shall mean: (1) Power generation technologies, as defined in §

39-26-5

, “eligible renewable energy resources,” including off-grid and on-grid generating technologies located in Rhode Island, as a priority; (2) Research and development activities in Rhode Island pertaining to eligible renewable energy resources and to other renewable energy technologies for electrical generation; or (3) Projects and activities directly related to implementing eligible renewable energy resources projects in Rhode Island. Technologies for converting solar energy for space heating or generating domestic hot water may also be funded through the renewable energy programs. Fuel cells may be considered an energy efficiency technology to be included in demand-side management programs. Special rates for low-income customers in effect as of August 7, 1996, shall be continued, and the costs of all of these discounts shall be included in the distribution rates charged to all other customers. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting an electric distribution company from offering any special rates or programs for low-income customers which are not in effect as of August 7, 1996, subject to the approval by the commission.

The renewable energy investment programs shall be administered pursuant to rules established by the Rhode Island commerce corporation. Said rules shall provide transparent criteria to rank qualified renewable energy projects, giving consideration to:

The feasibility of project completion;

The anticipated amount of renewable energy the project will produce;

The potential of the project to mitigate energy costs over the life of the project; and

The estimated cost per kilowatt-hour (KWh) of the energy produced from the project.

[Deleted by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 14.]

The chief executive officer of the commerce corporation is authorized and may enter into a contract with a contractor for the cost-effective administration of the renewable energy programs funded by this section. A competitive bid and contract award for administration of the renewable energy programs may occur every three (3) years and shall include, as a condition, that after July 1, 2008, the account for the renewable energy programs shall be maintained and administered by the commerce corporation as provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

Effective January 1, 2007, and for a period of twenty-one (21) years thereafter, each gas distribution company shall include, with the approval of the commission, a charge per deca therm delivered to fund demand-side management programs (the “gas demand-side charge”), including, but not limited to, programs for cost-effective energy efficiency, energy conservation, combined heat and power systems, and weatherization services for low-income households.

Each gas company shall establish a separate account for demand-side management programs (the “gas demand-side account”) that shall be funded by the gas demand-side charge and administered and implemented by the distribution company, subject to the regulatory reviewing authority of the commission. The commission may establish administrative mechanisms and procedures that are similar to those for electric demand-side management programs administered under the jurisdiction of the commission and that are designed to achieve cost-effectiveness and high, life-time savings of efficiency measures supported by the program.

The commission may, if reasonable and feasible, except from this demand-side management charge:

Gas used for distribution generation; and

Gas used for the manufacturing processes, where the customer has established a self-directed program to invest in and achieve best-effective energy efficiency in accordance with a plan approved by the commission and subject to periodic review and approval by the commission, which plan shall require annual reporting of the amount invested and the return on investments in terms of gas savings.

The commission may provide for the coordinated and/or integrated administration of electric and gas demand-side management programs in order to enhance the effectiveness of the programs. Such coordinated and/or integrated administration may after March 1, 2009, upon the recommendation of the office of energy resources, be through one or more third-party entities designated by the commission pursuant to a competitive selection process.

Effective January 1, 2007, the commission shall allocate, from demand-side management gas and electric funds authorized pursuant to this section, an amount not to exceed three percent (3%) of such funds on an annual basis for the retention of expert consultants, and reasonable administration costs of the energy efficiency and resources management council associated with planning, management, and evaluation of energy-efficiency programs, renewable energy programs, system reliability least-cost procurement, and with regulatory proceedings, contested cases, and other actions pertaining to the purposes, powers, and duties of the council, which allocation may by mutual agreement, be used in coordination with the office of energy resources to support such activities.

Effective January 1, 2016, the commission shall annually allocate from the administrative funding amount allocated in subsection (i) from the demand-side management program as described in subsection (i) as follows: forty percent (40%) for the purposes identified in subsection (i) and sixty percent (60%) annually to the office of energy resources for activities associated with planning, management, and evaluation of energy-efficiency programs, renewable energy programs, system reliability, least-cost procurement, and with regulatory proceedings, contested cases, and other actions pertaining to the purposes, powers, and duties of the office of energy resources.

On April 15, of each year, the office and the council shall submit to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives, separate financial and performance reports regarding the demand-side management programs, including the specific level of funds that were contributed by the residential, municipal, and commercial and industrial sectors to the overall programs; the businesses, vendors, and institutions that received funding from demand-side management gas and electric funds used for the purposes in this section; and the businesses, vendors, and institutions that received the administrative funds for the purposes in subsections (i) and (j). These reports shall be posted electronically on the websites of the office of energy resources and the energy efficiency and resources management council.

On or after August 1, 2015, at the request of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, each electric distribution company, except for the Pascoag Utility District and Block Island Power Company, shall remit two percent (2%) of the amount of the 2014 electric demand-side charge collections to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

On or after August 1, 2015, at the request of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, each gas distribution company shall remit two percent (2%) of the amount of the 2014 gas demand-side charge collections to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

Effective January 1, 2022, the commission shall allocate, from demand-side management gas and electric funds authorized pursuant to this section, five million dollars ($5,000,000) of such funds on an annual basis to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank. Gas and electric demand-side funds transferred to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank pursuant to this section shall be eligible to be used in any energy efficiency, renewable energy, or demand-side management project financing program administered by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank notwithstanding any other restrictions on the use of such collections set forth in this chapter. The infrastructure bank shall report annually to the commission within ninety (90) days of the end of each calendar year how collections transferred under this section were utilized.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 105; P.L. 2001, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 7; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 28, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 228, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 422, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 14; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 6; P.L. 2016, ch. 149, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 223, § 2, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 224, § 2, effective July 8, 2021.

39-2-1.3.
Payment for cellular telephone services — Late charges.

No subscriber to a cellular telephone service shall be subject to an assessment of a late fee on a monthly billing unless the payment is at least thirty (30) days past the close of the billing period that is the subject of the statement. A cellular telephone operator shall not impose a late fee unless the bill contains a clear and conspicuous notice of when the late fee is to be imposed consistent with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 344, § 1.

39-2-1.4.
Reasonable backup or supplemental rates.

Electricity produced by cogeneration and small power production can be of benefit to the public as part of the total energy supply of the entire electric grid of the state or consumed by a cogenerator or small power producer. Subject to compliance with applicable rules governing service, public utilities shall provide transmission or distribution service to enable a retail customer to transmit electrical power generated by the customer at one location to the customer’s facilities at another location, if the commission finds that the provision of this service, and the charges, terms, and other conditions associated with the provision of this service, are not likely to result in higher cost electric service to the utility’s general body of retail and wholesale customers or adversely affect the adequacy or reliability of electric service to all customers.

Each electric distribution company shall provide backup and supplemental service to any customer who is self-generating electricity and meets reasonable interconnection requirements designed to protect the distribution and transmission system. The commission shall ensure that backup and supplemental rates made, exacted, demanded, or collected by any public utility from a customer who is self-generating shall be just and reasonable and may not be unduly discriminatory. Any backup and supplemental rate tariffs in effect as of May 2002 may remain in effect as designed through December 31, 2004. Commencing January 1, 2005, the backup and supplemental rates shall be cost-based but may be discounted as provided for in subsection (c); provided, however, that the John O. Pastore Center power plant shall be exempt from the backup or supplemental rates.

Notwithstanding the rate design criteria set forth in subsection (b), the commission may permit or require discounted backup-distribution-service rates in order to encourage economically efficient cogeneration or small power-production projects if it finds these discounts to be in the public interest and/or contribute to system reliability procurement or least-cost procurement; provided, however, that any revenue not recovered by the electric distribution company as a result of these discounted distribution rates shall be accounted for and recovered in the rates assessed on all customers. The commission shall, in determining the public interest in distributed-generating facilities, consider reduced environmental impacts, increased energy efficiency, reduced transmission losses and congestion, effects on electric system reliability, and other factors the commission may deem relevant.

The provisions of this section shall be effective as of January 1, 2005.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 7.

39-2-2.
Rate discrimination.

If any public utility or any agent or officer of a public utility, as defined in chapter 1 of this title, shall directly or indirectly, by any device whatsoever, or otherwise, charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person, firm, or corporation a greater or less compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered by it, in, or affecting, or relating to the transportation of persons or property between points within this state, the distribution of electricity, or the production, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of heat, or water, or the conveyance of telegraph or telephone messages, or for any service in connection therewith, than that prescribed in the published schedules or tariffs then in force or established as provided herein, or than it charges, demands, collects, or receives from any other person, firm, or corporation for a like and contemporaneous service, under substantially similar circumstances and conditions, the public utility shall be guilty of unjust discrimination which is hereby prohibited and declared to be unlawful and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense; and the agent or officer so offending shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Nothing in this section or any other provision of the law shall be construed to prohibit the giving by any public utility of free or reduced-rate service to any elderly person as defined by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 36; G.L. 1956, § 39-22; P.L. 1971, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 3; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-2-3.
Unreasonable preferences or prejudices.

If any public utility shall make or give any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any particular person, firm, or corporation, or shall subject any particular person, firm, or corporation to any undue or unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever, the public utility shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Nothing in this section or any other provision of the law shall be construed to prohibit the giving by any public utility, of free or reduced-rate service to an elderly person as defined by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-3

; P.L. 1971, ch. 256, § 2.

39-2-4.
Acceptance of unlawful rebates or advantages.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation knowingly to solicit, accept, or receive any rebate, concession, or discrimination in respect to any service in, affecting, or relating to the transportation of persons or property, or affecting or relating to the distribution of electricity, or the production, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of heat or water, or the conveyance of telephone or telegraph messages within this state, or for any service in connection therewith, whereby the service shall, by any device whatsoever or otherwise, be rendered free, or at a less rate than that named in the published schedules and tariffs in force, as provided therein, or whereby any service or advantage is received other than is herein specified. Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-4

; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 4; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-2-5.
Exceptions to anti-discrimination provisions.

The provisions of §§

39-2-2

—

39-2-4

shall be subject to the following exceptions:

A public utility may issue or give free transportation or service to its employees and their families, its officers, agents, surgeons, physicians, and attorneys at law, and to the officers, agents, and employees, and their families of any other public utility.

With the approval of the division, any public utility may give free transportation or service, upon such conditions as the public utility may impose, or grant special rates therefor to the state, to any town or city, or to any water or fire district, and to the officers thereof, for public purposes, and also to any special class or classes of persons, not otherwise referred to in this section, in cases where the same shall seem to the division just and reasonable, or required in the interests of the public, and not unjustly discriminatory.

With the approval of the division, any public utility operating a railroad or street railway may furnish to the publishers of newspapers and magazines, and to their employees, passenger transportation in return for advertising in the newspapers or magazines at full rates.

With the approval of the division, any public utility may exchange its service for the service of any other public utility furnishing a different class of service.

Nothing in this section or any other provision of the law shall be construed to prohibit the giving by any public utility, of free or reduced-rate service to an elderly person as defined by the division.

Any motor carrier of persons, as defined in chapter 13 of this title, may elect to file a tariff providing for a rate reduction of twenty-five percent (25%) below its one-way-fare tariff applying to any person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older and any person assisting and traveling with a blind passenger who is not required to pay any fare pursuant to the provisions of §

39-2-13

for bus rides between the hours of ten o’clock (10:00) a.m. and three o’clock (3:00) p.m. of each day. In such event, the reduced fare shall be paid in part by the passenger and in part by the state. That part of the reduced fare payable by the state shall be one-half (1/2) of the reduced fare adjusted upward to end in the nearest zero (0) or five cents (.05), and that part payable by the passenger shall be the balance of the reduced fare. Payments by the state under this section shall be paid monthly under procedures agreed upon by the department of transportation and the carrier.

[Deleted by P.L. 2004, ch. 378, § 4, and by P.L. 2004, ch. 504, § 4.]

Any person, firm, or corporation or any officer, agent, servant, or employee thereof who shall violate the provisions of subsection (7) of this section by fraudulently obtaining a telecommunications device shall, upon conviction, be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned for a term not exceeding one year.

Nothing in this section or any other provision of the general laws shall be construed to prohibit the commission from taking actions to enable the state to participate in a Federal Communications Commission telephone lifeline program. The commission may set a subscriber-funded, monthly residence basic exchange lifeline telephone service credit in an amount not to exceed the federal subscriber line access charge or the monthly basic-service charge, whichever is less, for those persons who receive Supplemental Security Income (SSI), Aid to Families With Dependent Children (AFDC), general public assistance (GPA), aid from the Rhode Island medical assistance program, or food stamps issued pursuant to the Food Stamp Act of 1964 as amended (Pub. L. No. 88-525 and amendments made thereto, 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.), assistance from the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) as administered by the department of administration, division of planning, and effective April 1, 1993, assistance from the Rhode Island pharmaceutical assistance program administered by the office of healthy aging. The public utilities commission may promulgate regulations to implement this section. The department of human services and the department of administration, division of planning, shall certify subscriber eligibility for the programs in accordance with public utilities commission and Federal Communications Commission guidelines.

The department of human services shall report monthly to the governor and to the house of representatives fiscal advisor the number of persons newly eligible for the lifeline telephone service credit hereunder solely by virtue of their eligibility to receive food stamp assistance and the department of administration, division of planning, shall, also, report monthly to the governor and to the house of representatives fiscal advisor the number of persons newly eligible for the lifeline telephone service credit hereunder solely by virtue of their participation in the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP).

Nothing in this section or any other provision of the general laws shall be construed to prohibit any public utility with the approval of the commission, from forgiving arrearages of any person in accordance with the provisions of §

39-2-1(d)

.

Nothing in this section or any other provision of the law shall be construed to prohibit any utility company from cutting, disconnecting, or removing mains, poles, wires, conduits, or fixtures free of charge to nonprofit housing development corporations prior to moving a building to be used as affordable housing for at least a ten-year (10) period.

Nothing in this section or any other provision of the general laws shall be construed to prohibit any telecommunications provider, with the approval of the commission, from offering any residential customer a reduced rate, provided such rate covers all costs. A telecommunications provider may offer a business customer a reduced rate without commission approval; provided that the rate covers all costs.

A gas or electric distribution company may provide discounts to low-income customers in accordance with the affordable energy plan provisions of § 42-141-5(d) [repealed]. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the continuation of any low-income discounts approved by the commission prior to January 1, 2006, and in effect as of that date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-5

; P.L. 1971, ch. 256, § 3; P.L. 1976, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 580, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 115, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 105; P.L. 2004, ch. 378, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 504, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 7; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 20; P.L. 2011, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 148, § 1.

39-2-6.
Repair and construction of highway bridges used by street railways.

Whenever any highway bridge over which a street railway is operated shall become unsafe for public travel, the public utility operating the railway shall pay the whole expense of repairing, strengthening, or reconstructing the bridge, if the bridge would be safe for public travel if the railway were not operated over it; but, if a reconstruction of the bridge or the construction of a new bridge is required for any other cause, or if the bridge would be unsafe for public travel if the railway were not operated over it, then so much of the expense of repairing, strengthening, constructing, or reconstructing the bridge as may be equitable shall be paid by the public utility operating the railway. In the event of any disagreement between the public utility and the town or city bound by law to maintain the bridge, as to the necessity of any repair or reconstruction thereof, or as to the character of the repair or reconstruction, or as to the apportionment of the expense of the repair or reconstruction, the commission, upon application of any party in interest, and after due hearing, shall make such orders as it shall deem necessary, in the interest of public safety, for the repair, strengthening, or reconstruction of the bridge, and shall determine in accordance with the principle herein stated, the portion of the expense of the repair, strengthening, or reconstruction that shall be borne by the public utility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 53; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 49; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 2.

39-2-7.
Civil liability for violations — Limitation of actions.

If any public utility shall do, or cause to be done, or permit to be done, any matter, act, or thing in chapters 1 — 5 of this title prohibited or declared to be unlawful, or shall omit to do any act, matter, or thing to be done by it, the public utility shall be liable to the person, firm, or corporation injured thereby, in a civil action to be brought within three (3) years from the time the cause of action accrues, and not after, for the amount of damage sustained in consequence of the violation; provided, that any recovery as provided in this section, shall in no manner affect the recovery by the state of the penalty prescribed for the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-7

.